Washington statutes.
RCW 19.150.040

Unpaid rent—Termination of occupant's rights—Notice.

(1) When any part of the rent or other charges due from an occupant remains unpaid for fourteen consecutive days, an owner may terminate the right of the occupant to the use of the storage space at a self-service storage facility by sending a preliminary lien notice to the occupant's last known address, and to the alternative address specified in RCW 19.150.120(2), by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or electronic mail [email] address, containing all of the following:

(a) An itemized statement of the owner's claim showing the sums due at the time of the notice and the date when the sums become due.

(b) A statement that the occupant's right to use the storage space will terminate on a specified date (not less than fourteen days after the notice is sent) unless all sums due and to become due by that date are paid by the occupant prior to the specified date.

(c) A notice that the occupant may be denied or continue to be denied, as the case may be, access to the storage space after the termination date if the sums are not paid, and that an owner's lien, as provided for in RCW 19.150.020 may be imposed thereafter.

(d) The name, street address, and telephone number of the owner, or his or her designated agent, whom the occupant may contact to respond to the notice.

(2) The owner may not send by electronic mail [email] the notice required under this section to the occupant's last known address or alternative address unless:

(a) The occupant expressly agrees to notice by electronic mail [email];

(b) The rental agreement executed by the occupant specifies in bold type that notices will be given to the occupant by electronic mail [email];

(c) The owner provides the occupant with the electronic mail [email] address from which notices will be sent and directs the occupant to modify his or her email settings to allow electronic mail [email] from that address to avoid any filtration systems; and

(d) The owner notifies the occupant of any change in the electronic mail [email] address from which notices will be sent prior to the address change.

[ 2015 c 13 s 2; 2007 c 113 s 2; 1988 c 240 s 5.]